District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.05

Establishment of Office of the Tenant Advocate.

The Office of the Tenant Advocate is established as an independent agency within the District government.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2065, 52 DCR 7503
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(d), 53 DCR 6703
This section is referenced in § 42-3531.04.
D.C. Law 16-181 substituted “independent agency within the District government” for “office within the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2065 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
Transfer of functions of Office of the Tenant Advocate of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs: Section 4 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “All positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, assessments, and other funds available or to be made available to the Office of the Tenant Advocate of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs relating to the duties and functions assigned herein are transferred to the independent Office of the Tenant Advocate.”